Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.810

Obtaining information by false pretenses—Unauthorized use of information—Falsifying records—Penalty.

Any person who willfully requests, obtains or seeks to obtain criminal history record information under false pretenses, or who willfully communicates or seeks to communicate criminal history record information to any agency or person except in accordance with chapter 152, Laws of 1972 ex. sess., or any member, officer, employee or agent of the section, the council or any participating agency, who willfully falsifies criminal history record information, or any records relating thereto, shall for each such offense be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2006 c 294 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 314 s 17; 1972 ex.s. c 152 s 23.]